Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1367.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 102(q.1), 1302.2(c), 1308(g)(1.1) and (2), 1302.2-D(a)(3) and 1602-A(j)(1) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:* * *(q.1) The word "pre-canvass" shall mean the inspection and opening of all envelopes containing official absentee ballots or mail-in ballots, the removal of such ballots from the envelopes and the [counting, computing and tallying of the votes reflected on the ballots.] preparation of the ballots for scanning, including unfolding, straightening and duplicating, if the ballot is damaged in some way that prevents it from being scanned, but where the voter's intent is still clear. The term includes scanning the ballot into a voting machine or other automatic tabulating device, if the equipment used by the county board of elections permits a ballot to be scanned without tabulating or counting the votes on the ballot scanned. The term does not include the examination of unopened absentee or mail-in ballot envelopes for processing, detecting voter errors or recording or publishing of the votes reflected on the ballots.* * *Section 1302.2. Approval of Application for Absentee Ballot.--* * *(c) The county board of elections, upon receipt of any application of a qualified elector required to be registered under the provisions of preceding section 1301, shall determine the qualifications of such applicant by verifying the proof of identification and comparing the information set forth on such application with the information contained on the applicant's permanent registration card. If the board is satisfied that the applicant is qualified to receive an official absentee ballot, 20260SB1367PN1781 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the application shall be marked "approved." Such approval decision shall be final and binding, except that challenges may be made only on the ground that the applicant was not a qualified elector. Such challenges must be made to the county board of elections prior to five o'clock p.m. on the Friday prior to the election or prior to the pre-canvass of an elector's absentee ballot, whichever is earlier: Provided, however, That a challenge to an application for an absentee ballot shall not be permitted on the grounds that the elector used an application for an absentee ballot instead of an application for a mail-in ballot or on the grounds that the elector used an application for a mail-in ballot instead of an application for an absentee ballot.* * *Section 1308. Canvassing of Official Absentee Ballots and Mail-in Ballots.--* * *(g) * * *(1.1) The county board of elections shall meet no earlier than [seven] nine o'clock A.M. on the seventh day prior to election day and no later than seven o'clock A.M. on election day to pre-canvass all ballots received prior to the meeting. The pre-canvass meeting may continue until eight o'clock P.M. on election day. A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a pre-canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice of a pre-canvass meeting on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are pre-canvassed. No person observing, attending or participating in a 20260SB1367PN1781 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pre-canvass meeting may disclose the results of any portion of any pre-canvass meeting prior to the close of the polls.(2) The county board of elections shall meet no earlier than the close of polls on the day of the election and no later than the [third] day following the election to begin canvassing absentee ballots and mail-in ballots not included in the pre-canvass meeting. The meeting under this paragraph shall continue until all absentee ballots and mail-in ballots received prior to the close of the polls have been canvassed. The county board of elections shall not record or publish any votes reflected on the ballots prior to the close of the polls. The canvass process shall continue through the eighth day following the election for valid military-overseas ballots timely received under 25 Pa.C.S. § 3511 (relating to receipt of voted ballot). A county board of elections shall provide at least forty-eight hours' notice of a canvass meeting by publicly posting a notice on its publicly accessible Internet website. One authorized representative of each candidate in an election and one representative from each political party shall be permitted to remain in the room in which the absentee ballots and mail-in ballots are canvassed.* * *Section 1302.2-D. Approval of application for mail-in ballot.(a) Approval process.--The county board of elections, upon receipt of any application of a qualified elector under section 1301-D, shall determine the qualifications of the applicant by verifying the proof of identification and comparing the information provided on the application with the information contained on the applicant's permanent registration card. The following shall apply:* * *20260SB1367PN1781 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Challenges must be made to the county board of elections prior to five o'clock p.m. on the Friday prior to the election or prior to the pre-canvass of an elector's mail-in ballot, whichever is earlier: Provided, however, That a challenge to an application for a mail-in ballot shall not be permitted on the grounds that the elector used an application for a mail-in ballot instead of an application for an absentee ballot or on the grounds that the elector used an application for an absentee ballot instead of an application for a mail-in ballot.* * *Section 1602-A. Funding for elections.* * *(j) Grant agreement.--The grant agreement between the department and the county under this section shall include the following requirements for counties:(1) The county shall begin pre-canvassing [at] no later than 7 a.m. on election day and shall continue without interruption until each mail-in ballot and absentee ballot timely received [by 7 a.m. on election day is pre-canvassed] is canvassed.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20260SB1367PN1781 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223